Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Aliens

66-2-101. Alien ownership.

An alien, resident or nonresident of the United States, may take and hold property, real or personal, in this state and dispose of or transmit the same as a native citizen.

Acts 1875, ch. 2, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 3659; mod. Code 1932, § 7187; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-201.

Cross-References. Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 92, 95.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Aliens, §§ 4, 5; 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 21.

66-2-102. Heirs or devisees of alien.

The heir or heirs, devisee or devisees, of such an alien may take any lands, so held by descent or otherwise, as if a citizen or citizens of the United States.

Acts 1875, ch. 2, § 3; Shan., § 3660; mod. Code 1932, § 7188; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-202.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 92, 95.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Aliens, § 4.

Collateral References.

Dower of alien widow in estate of deceased husband. 110 A.L.R. 520.

Escheat for alienage of owner, or kindred of owner, who dies intestate. 23 A.L.R. 1237.

Right of alien enemy to take by inheritance or will. 137 A.L.R. 1328, 147 A.L.R. 1297, 150 A.L.R. 1418, 152 A.L.R. 1450.

State statute making right of alien to succeed to property of deceased person dependent upon a reciprocal right in United States citizens, construction and application. 170 A.L.R. 966.